Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5525.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following words, in paragraph (e), after the words "five hundred and one (c)(3)", by inserting the
following: "or five hundred and one (c)(19).
This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1